zh-CN: 冲击防护等级: EN 14120 1 级; EN 14120 2 级; EN 1621-1 1 级; EN 1621-1 2 级; 未认证; 其他
fi: Iskusuojausluokitus: EN 14120 taso 1; EN 14120 taso 2; EN 1621-1 taso 1; EN 1621-1 taso 2; Ei sertifioitu; Muu
el: Βαθμός προστασίας από κρούση: EN 14120 Επίπεδο 1; EN 14120 Επίπεδο 2; EN 1621-1 Επίπεδο 1; EN 1621-1 Επίπεδο 2; Χωρίς πιστοποίηση; Άλλο
de: Aufprallschutzklasse: EN 14120 Level 1; EN 14120 Level 2; EN 1621-1 Level 1; EN 1621-1 Level 2; Nicht zertifiziert; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Proteção contra impacto classificação: EN 14120 Nível 1; EN 14120 Nível 2; EN 1621-1 Nível 1; EN 1621-1 Nível 2; Não certificado; Outro
es: Clasificación de protección contra impactos: EN 14120 Nivel 1; EN 14120 Nivel 2; EN 1621-1 Nivel 1; EN 1621-1 Nivel 2; Sin certificación; Otra
fr: Classement de protection contre les impacts: EN 14120 niveau 1; EN 14120 niveau 2; EN 1621-1 niveau 1; EN 1621-1 niveau 2; Non certifié; Autre
sk-SK: Stupeň ochrany proti nárazom: EN 14120 Úroveň 1; EN 14120 Úroveň 2; EN 1621-1 Úroveň 1; EN 1621-1 Úroveň 2; Necerfitikované; Iné
ja: Impact保護等級: EN 14120 レベル 1; EN 14120 レベル 2; EN 1621-1 レベル 1; EN 1621-1 レベル 2; 認定なし; その他
ro-RO: Clasa de protecție împotriva impactului: EN 14120 Nivelul 1; EN 14120 Nivelul 2; EN 1621-1 Nivelul 1; EN 1621-1 Nivelul 2; Necertificat; Altele
ko: Impact 보호 등급: EN 14120 레벨 1; EN 14120 레벨 2; EN 1621-1 레벨 1; EN 1621-1 레벨 2; 인증되지 않음; 기타
en: Impact protection rating: EN 14120 Level 1; EN 14120 Level 2; EN 1621-1 Level 1; EN 1621-1 Level 2; Not certified; Other
sl-SI: Ocena zaščite pred udarci: EN 14120, raven 1; EN 14120, raven 2; EN 1621-1, raven 1; EN 1621-1, raven 2; Ni certificirano; Drugo
da: Slagbeskyttelsesniveau: EN 14120 niveau 1; EN 14120 niveau 2; EN 1621-1 niveau 1; EN 1621-1 niveau 2; Ikke certificeret; Andet
zh-TW: 衝擊防護等級: EN 14120 等級 1; EN 14120 等級 2; EN 1621-1 等級 1; EN 1621-1 等級 2; 未認證; 其他
nl: Impactbescherming beoordeling: EN 14120 niveau 1; EN 14120 niveau 2; EN 1621-1 niveau 1; EN 1621-1 niveau 2; Niet gecertificeerd; Overig
th: ระดับการป้องกันแรงกระแทก: EN 14120 ระดับ 1; EN 14120 ระดับ 2; EN 1621-1 ระดับ 1; EN 1621-1 ระดับ 2; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; อื่นๆ
sv: Stötskyddsklassificering: EN 14120 nivå 1; EN 14120 nivå 2; EN 1621-1 nivå 1; EN 1621-1 nivå 2; Icke-certifierad; Övrigt
pt-PT: Classificação de proteção contra impactos: EN 14120 Nível 1; EN 14120 Nível 2; EN 1621-1 Nível 1; EN 1621-1 Nível 2; Não certificado; Outro
cs: Hodnocení nárazové ochrany: EN 14120 Úroveň 1; EN 14120 Úroveň 2; EN 1621-1 Úroveň 1; EN 1621-1 Úroveň 2; Bez certifikace; Ostatní
vi: Xếp hạng bảo vệ chống va đập: EN 14120 Level 1; EN 14120 Level 2; EN 1621-1 Level 1; EN 1621-1 Level 2; Không được chứng nhận; Khác
tr: Darbe koruma derecesi: EN 14120 Seviye 1; EN 14120 Seviye 2; EN 1621-1 Seviye 1; EN 1621-1 Seviye 2; Sertifikalı değil; Diğer
bg-BG: Клас на защита при удар: EN 14120 ниво 1; EN 14120 ниво 2; EN 1621-1 ниво 1; EN 1621-1 ниво 2; Без сертификат; Други
lt-LT: Smūgio apsaugos įvertinimas: EN 14120 1 lygis; EN 14120 2 lygis; EN 1621-1 1 lygis; EN 1621-1 2 lygis; Nesertifikuota; Kita
nb: Støtbeskyttelsesklassifisering: EN 14120 Nivå 1; EN 14120 Nivå 2; EN 1621-1 Nivå 1; EN 1621-1 Nivå 2; Ikke sertifisert; Annet
it: Grado di protezione adgli impatti: EN 14120 Livello 1; EN 14120 Livello 2; EN 1621-1 Livello 1; EN 1621-1 Livello 2; Non certificato; Altro
hr-HR: Ocjena zaštite od udaraca: EN 14120 razina 1; EN 14120 razina 2; EN 1621-1 razina 1; EN 1621-1 razina 2; Nije certificirano; Ostalo
ru: Класс ударозащиты: EN 14120, Уровень 1; EN 14120, Уровень 2; EN 1621-1, Уровень 1; EN 1621-1, Уровень 2; Не сертифицировано; Другое
pl: Klasa ochrony przed uderzeniami: EN 14120 Poziom 1; EN 14120 Poziom 2; EN 1621-1 Poziom 1; EN 1621-1 Poziom 2; Brak certyfikatu; Inne
hu: Ütésvédelmi besorolás: EN 14120 1-es szint; EN 14120 2-es szint; EN 1621-1 1-es szint; EN 1621-1 2-es szint; Nem tanúsított; Egyéb